District of Columbia statutes.
2-381.22

Electronic procurement.

(a)

The CPO may issue a solicitation by any electronic medium, including the Internet, electronic mail, or disk medium.

(b)

The CPO may accept responses to solicitations by any electronic medium, including the Internet, electronic mail, or disk medium.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 1202
as added Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-64, § 2(f), 56 DCR 6603
This section is referenced in § 2-312.02.
2001 Ed., § 2-312.02.